Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.320

Duplicate, nonexistent, untrue names—Penalty.

A person is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW who files a declaration of candidacy for any public office of:

(1) A nonexistent or fictitious person; or

(2) The name of any person not his or her true name; or

(3) A name similar to that of an incumbent seeking reelection to the same office with intent to confuse and mislead the electors by taking advantage of the public reputation of the incumbent; or

(4) A surname similar to one who has already filed for the same office, and whose political reputation is widely known, with intent to confuse and mislead the electors by capitalizing on the public reputation of the candidate who had previously filed.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2118; 2003 c 53 s 177; 1965 c 9 s 29.18.070. Prior: (i) 1943 c 198 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 5213-11. (ii) 1943 c 198 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 5213-12. Formerly RCW 29.15.100, 29.18.070.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2003 c 53 s 177 and by 2003 c 111 s 2118, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.